Utah statutes.
49-20-201.   Program participation -- Eligibility -- Optional for certain groups.

(1) (a)  The state shall participate in the program on behalf of its employees.

(b)  Other employers, including political subdivisions and educational institutions, are eligible, but are not required,  to participate in the program on behalf of their employees.

(2) (a)  The Department of Health may participate in the program for the purpose of providing health and dental benefits to children enrolled in the Utah Children's Health Insurance Program created in Title 26, Chapter 40, Utah Children's Health Insurance Act, if the provisions in Subsection 26-40-110(4) occur.

(b)  If the Department of Health participates in the program under the provisions of this Subsection (2), all insurance risk associated with the Children's Health Insurance Program shall be the responsibility of the Department of Health and not the program or the office.

(3)  A covered individual shall be eligible for coverage after termination of employment under rules adopted by the board.

(4)  Only the following are eligible for Medicare supplement coverage under this chapter upon becoming eligible for Medicare Part A and Part B coverage:

(a)  retirees;

(b)  members;

(c)  participants;

(d)  employees who have medical employee benefit plan coverage at the time of their retirement; and

(e)  current spouses of those who are eligible under Subsections (4)(a) through (d).



Amended by Chapter 130, 2007 General Session

